New York, session 2025-2026, S9381.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 590 of the labor 2 law, as amended by section 3 of part KK of chapter 56 of the laws of 3 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) A claimant's weekly benefit amount shall be one twenty-sixth of 5 the remuneration paid during the highest calendar quarter of the base 6 period by employers, liable for contributions or payments in lieu of 7 contributions under this article, provided the claimant has remuneration 8 paid in all four calendar quarters during such claimant's base period or 9 alternate base period, but shall not be less than the greater of two 10 hundred fifty dollars or fifteen percent of the state average weekly 11 wage. However, for any claimant who has remuneration paid in all four 12 calendar quarters during such claimant's base period or alternate base 13 period and whose high calendar quarter remuneration during the base 14 period is three thousand five hundred seventy-five dollars or less, the 15 benefit amount shall be one twenty-fifth of the remuneration paid during 16 the highest calendar quarter of the base period by employers liable for 17 contributions or payments in lieu of contributions under this article, 18 but shall not be less than the greater of two hundred fifty dollars or 19 fifteen percent of the state average weekly wage. A claimant's weekly 20 benefit shall be one twenty-sixth of the average remuneration paid in 21 the two highest quarters paid during the base period or alternate base 22 period by employers liable for contributions or payments in lieu of 23 contributions under this article when the claimant has remuneration paid 24 in two or three calendar quarters provided however, that a claimant 25 whose high calendar quarter is four thousand dollars or less but greater 26 than three thousand five hundred seventy-five dollars shall have a week- 27 ly benefit amount of one twenty-sixth of such high calendar quarter, but 28 shall not be less than the greater of two hundred fifty dollars or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14161-02-6 S. 9381 2 1 fifteen percent of the state average weekly wage. However, for any 2 claimant who has remuneration paid in two or three calendar quarters 3 during such claimant's base period or alternate base period and whose 4 high calendar quarter remuneration during the base period is three thou- 5 sand five hundred seventy-five dollars or less, the benefit amount shall 6 be one twenty-fifth of the remuneration paid during the highest calendar 7 quarter of the base period by employers liable for contributions or 8 payments in lieu of contributions under this article, but shall not be 9 less than the greater of two hundred fifty dollars or fifteen percent of 10 the state average weekly wage. Any claimant whose high calendar quarter 11 remuneration during the base period is more than three thousand five 12 hundred seventy-five dollars shall not have a weekly benefit amount less 13 than [one] the greater of two hundred [forty-three] fifty dollars or 14 fifteen percent of the state average weekly wage. The weekly benefit 15 amount, so computed, that is not a multiple of one dollar shall be 16 lowered to the next multiple of one dollar. On the first Monday of 17 September, nineteen hundred ninety-eight the weekly benefit amount shall 18 not exceed three hundred sixty-five dollars nor be less than forty 19 dollars, until the first Monday of September, two thousand, at which 20 time the maximum benefit payable pursuant to this subdivision shall 21 equal one-half of the state average weekly wage for covered employment 22 as calculated by the department no sooner than July first, two thousand 23 and no later than August first, two thousand, rounded down to the lowest 24 dollar. On and after the first Monday of October, two thousand fourteen, 25 the weekly benefit shall not be less than one hundred dollars, nor shall 26 it exceed four hundred twenty dollars until the first Monday of October, 27 two thousand fifteen when the maximum benefit amount shall be four 28 hundred twenty-five dollars, until the first Monday of October, two 29 thousand sixteen when the maximum benefit amount shall be four hundred 30 thirty dollars, until the first Monday of October, two thousand seven- 31 teen when the maximum benefit amount shall be four hundred thirty-five 32 dollars, until the first Monday of October, two thousand eighteen when 33 the maximum benefit amount shall be four hundred fifty dollars, until 34 the first Monday of October, two thousand nineteen when the maximum 35 benefit amount shall be thirty-six percent of the average weekly wage 36 until the first Monday of October, two thousand twenty-five when the 37 maximum benefit amount shall be eight hundred sixty-nine dollars, until 38 the first Monday of October, two thousand twenty-six and each year ther- 39 eafter on the first Monday of October when the [maximum] benefit amount 40 shall not be less than the greater of two hundred fifty dollars or 41 fifteen percent of the state average weekly wage and shall not exceed 42 fifty percent of the average weekly wage provided, however, that in no 43 event shall the maximum benefit amount be reduced from the previous 44 year. 45 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.